District of Columbia statutes.
24-709

Release of patient.

(a)

When the head of the hospital to which the patient is committed finds that the patient appears to be no longer in need of confinement for treatment purposes, or has received maximum benefits, he shall give notice to the judge of the committing court, and said patient shall be delivered to the said court for such further action as the court may deem necessary and proper under the provisions of §§ 24-701 to 24-711.

(b)

The court, upon petition of the patient after confinement for 1 year, shall inquire into the refusal or failure of the head of the hospital to release him. If the court finds that the patient is no longer in need of care, treatment, guidance, or rehabilitation, or has received maximum benefits, it shall order the patient released, in accordance with the provisions of § 24-710.

History

June 24, 1953, 67 Stat. 79, ch. 149, § 10
July 24, 1956, 70 Stat. 611, ch. 676, title I, § 101

Section References

This section is referenced in § 24-708.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-609.
1973 Ed., § 24-609.